Maine, session 132, LD1334.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §16 is enacted to read:
§16. Display of liquor
A retailer shall display liquor that is not placed in a display case or behind the counter
at least 48 inches from a cash register or payment terminal. For purposes of this section,
"payment terminal" means a device that facilitates the payment for a product by a retail
customer.